Tennessee, session 114, SB1661.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-5-106, is amended by deleting the
section and substituting:
The board shall make an annual report of its proceedings and activities by
February 1 each year, to the governor and the general assembly, with copies to be
made available to any interested parties.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1661
011254
- 1 -